Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-301
Act, how cited.

Sections 20-301 to 20-344 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Fair Housing Act.

Laws 1969, c. 120, § 23, p. 553;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 20-125;

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB540, § 15.